Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 18 Child Maltreatment Act
12-18-310. Referrals on children born with and affected by fetal alcohol spectrum disorder or prenatal drug exposure to an illegal drug or a legal substance.

All healthcare providers involved in the delivery or care of infants shall:

Contact the Department of Human Services regarding an infant born with and affected by:

A fetal alcohol spectrum disorder;

Maternal substance abuse resulting in prenatal drug exposure to an illegal or a legal substance; or

Withdrawal symptoms resulting from prenatal drug exposure to an illegal or a legal substance; and

Share all pertinent information, including health information, with the department regarding an infant born with and affected by:

A fetal alcohol spectrum disorder;

Maternal substance abuse resulting in prenatal drug exposure to an illegal or a legal substance; or

Withdrawal symptoms resulting from prenatal drug exposure to an illegal or a legal substance.

The department shall accept referrals, calls, and other communications from healthcare providers involved in the delivery or care of infants born with and affected by:

A fetal alcohol spectrum disorder;

Maternal substance abuse resulting in prenatal drug exposure to an illegal or a legal substance; or

Withdrawal symptoms resulting from prenatal drug exposure to an illegal or a legal substance.

A plan of safe care shall be developed for infants affected by:

A fetal alcohol spectrum disorder;

Maternal substance abuse resulting in prenatal drug exposure to an illegal or a legal substance; or

Withdrawal symptoms resulting from prenatal drug exposure to an illegal or a legal substance.

The plan of safe care shall be designed to ensure the safety and well-being of an infant following the release of the infant from the care of a healthcare provider.

A plan of safe care shall include content that addresses the health and substance use disorder treatment needs of the infant and affected family or caregiver.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the section heading, inserted “and affected by” and added “or prenatal drug exposure to an illegal drug or a legal substance”; substituted “born with and affected by” for “born and affected with” in the introductory language of (a)(1), (a)(2), and (b); added the (a)(1)(A), (a)(2)(A), (b)(1), and (c)(1) designations; in (c)(1), substituted “A plan” for “The department shall develop a plan”, inserted “shall be developed”, and substituted “affected by” for “affected with”; and added (a)(1)(B), (a)(1)(C), (a)(2)(B), (a)(2)(C), (b)(2), (b)(3), (c)(1)(B), (c)(1)(C), (c)(2)(A), and (c)(2)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 945, § 11: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some juveniles in Arkansas may be unaware of their rights under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., and other applicable law; that some individuals and entities that are responsible for the welfare of a juvenile may be unaware of the rights of the juvenile under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., and other applicable law; that the creation of the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission will help increase awareness of a juvenile's legal rights; that independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas is more than likely to result in recommendations that will further improve the procedures and operations of the child welfare system; and that this act is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

A person may immediately notify the Child Abuse Hotline if he or she:

Child maltreatment has occurred; or

A child has died as a result of child maltreatment; or

Observes a child being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would reasonably result in child maltreatment.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the (a) designation; and added (b).

Cross References. Civil and criminal liability, §12-18-107.

A person who in good faith notifies the hotline in accordance with subsection (a) of this section is immune from civil and criminal liability.

An individual listed as a mandated reporter under subsection (b) of this section shall immediately notify the Child Abuse Hotline if he or she:

Been subjected to child maltreatment;

Died as a result of child maltreatment; or

Died suddenly and unexpectedly; or

Observes a child being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would reasonably result in child maltreatment.

The following individuals are mandated reporters under this chapter:

A day care center worker;

A dentist;

A dental hygienist;

A domestic abuse advocate;

A domestic violence shelter employee;

A domestic violence shelter volunteer;

An employee of the Department of Human Services;

An employee working under contract for, or a contractor of, the Department of Human Services when acting within the scope of his or her contract or employment;

A foster parent;

A judge;

A law enforcement official;

A licensed nurse;

Medical personnel who may be engaged in the admission, examination, care, or treatment of persons;

A mental health professional or paraprofessional;

An osteopath;

A peace officer;

A physician;

A prosecuting attorney;

A resident intern;

A public or private school counselor;

A school official, including without limitation institutions of higher education;

A social worker;

A surgeon;

A teacher;

A court-appointed special advocate program staff member or volunteer;

A juvenile intake or probation officer;

A clergy member, which includes a minister, priest, rabbi, accredited Christian Science practitioner, or other similar functionary of a religious organization, or an individual reasonably believed to be so by the person consulting him or her, except to the extent the clergy member:

Has acquired knowledge of suspected child maltreatment through communications required to be kept confidential pursuant to the religious discipline of the relevant denomination or faith; or

Received the knowledge of the suspected child maltreatment from the alleged offender in the context of a statement of admission;

An employee of a child advocacy center or a child safety center;

An attorney ad litem in the course of his or her duties as an attorney ad litem;

A sexual abuse advocate or sexual abuse volunteer who works with a victim of sexual abuse as an employee of a community-based victim service or mental health agency such as Safe Places, United Family Services, Inc., or Centers for Youth and Families.

A sexual abuse advocate or sexual abuse volunteer includes a paid or volunteer sexual abuse advocate who is based with a local law enforcement agency;

A rape crisis advocate or rape crisis volunteer;

A child abuse advocate or child abuse volunteer who works with a child victim of abuse or maltreatment as an employee of a community-based victim service or a mental health agency such as Safe Places, United Family Services, Inc., or Centers for Youth and Families.

A child abuse advocate or child abuse volunteer includes a paid or volunteer sexual abuse advocate who is based with a local law enforcement agency;

A victim/witness coordinator;

A victim assistance professional or victim assistance volunteer;

An employee of the Crimes Against Children Division of the Division of Arkansas State Police;

An employee of a reproductive healthcare facility;

A volunteer at a reproductive healthcare facility;

An individual not otherwise identified in this subsection who is engaged in performing his or her employment duties with a nonprofit charitable organization other than a nonprofit hospital; and

A Child Welfare Ombudsman.

A mandated reporter who in good faith notifies the Child Abuse Hotline in accordance with subsection (a) of this section is immune from civil and criminal liability.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 725, § 1, provided: “Findings and purposes.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)Children are increasingly being preyed upon, victimized, and coerced into illegal sexual relationships by adults;

“(2)The Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., requires caretakers, healthcare facilities, healthcare providers, teachers, and other specified individuals to report suspected incidents of sexual crimes against children;

“(3)The physical, emotional, developmental, and psychological impact of sexual crimes on child victims can be severe and long-lasting;

“(4)The societal costs of these crimes are also significant and affect the entire populace;

“(5)The collection, maintenance, and preservation of evidence, including forensic tissue samples, furthers Arkansas's interest in protecting children from sexual crimes and provides the state with the tools necessary for successful investigations and prosecutions;

“(6)Parents and guardians have both the right and responsibility to be involved in medical treatment decisions involving their children, and no one has the right to knowingly or willfully impede or circumvent this right;

“(7)(A)There are documented cases of individuals other than a parent or guardian aiding, abetting, and assisting minor girls to procure abortions without their parents' or guardians' knowledge, consent, or involvement.

“(B)These activities of individuals other than a parent or guardian include transporting children across state lines to avoid Arkansas's parental involvement requirements for abortion; and

“(8)Such actions violate both the sanctity of the familial relationship and Arkansas's parental involvement law concerning abortion.

“(b)The General Assembly's purposes in enacting the Child Maltreatment Act are to further the important and compelling state interests of:

“(1)Protecting children from sexually predatory adults;

“(2)Ensuring that adults who are involved in illegal sexual relationships or contact with children are reported, investigated, and, when warranted, prosecuted;

“(3)(A)Relieving medical professionals and other mandatory reporters of suspected sexual crimes against children from any responsibility to personally investigate an allegation or suspicion.

“(B)Mandatory reporters must simply report allegations, suspicions, and pertinent facts.

“(C)Trained law enforcement or social services personnel are responsible for any investigation and for the ultimate disposition of the allegation or case;

“(4)Reducing the physical, emotional, developmental, and psychological impact of sexual crimes on child victims;

“(5)Reducing the societal and economic burden on the populace that results from sexual crimes against children;

“(6)Providing law enforcement officials with the tools and evidence necessary to investigate and prosecute child predators; and

“(7)Protecting and respecting the right of parents and guardians to be involved in the medical decisions and treatment of their children and preventing anyone from knowingly or willfully subverting or circumventing these rights.”

Acts 2019, No. 945, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission to provide for independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas”.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 1409 added (b)(32) through (b)(36).

The 2011 amendment added (b)(37).

The 2013 amendment by No. 725 added (b)(38) and (b)(39).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1086 added “or paraprofessional” in (b)(16); inserted “public or private” in (b)(22); added “including without limitation institutions of higher education” in (b)(23); and substituted “An employer or supervisor of an employee identified as a mandated reporter” for “A school, Head Start program, or day care facility” in (c)(2) and (3).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1056 added (b)(40).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1211 added (a)(1)(C).

The 2017 amendment deleted (a)(1)(C)(ii); and redesignated (a)(1)(C)(i) as (a)(1)(C).

The 2019 amendment by No. 186 added (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 531, in (b)(10), substituted “or a contractor of” for “the Division of Youth Services of” and added “when acting within the scope of his or her contract or employment”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 945 added (b)(41).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Breanna Trombley, Note: Criminal Law — No Stitches for Snitches: The Need for a Duty-to-Report Law in Arkansas, 34 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 813 (2012).

Prosecution must prove that a person is a “mandated reporter” in order to show a violation of §12-18-201, relating to mandatory reporting of child abuse; therefore, the jury was properly instructed as to the requirement of immediacy when it was given the statutory definition of a mandated reporter, along with the other statutory definitions of relevant terms, such as “child” and “child maltreatment.”Griffin v. State, 2015 Ark. App. 63, 454 S.W.3d 262 (2015).

Circuit court did not err in granting summary judgment in favor of a school district because it complied with The Teacher Fair Dismissal Act of 1983, §6-17-1501 et seq., when it terminated a school principal for just and reasonable cause; the school board heard uncontested evidence that the principal did not call the child-abuse hotline as required by this section when she became aware of the contents of a child's letter detailing that she had been touched by her grandfather and that she had “bad things” in her life.Struble v. Blytheville Sch. Dist., 2017 Ark. App. 99, 516 S.W.3d 269 (2017).

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1143, § 7; 2019, No. 598, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Reporting Suspected Child Maltreatment

12-18-401. Generally.

Has reasonable cause to suspect that:

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2019, No. 970, § 1.

12-18-402. Mandated reporters.

Has reasonable cause to suspect that a child has:

A child care worker or foster care worker;

A coroner;

(1)A privilege or contract shall not prevent a person from reporting child maltreatment when he or she is a mandated reporter and required to report under this section.

An employer or supervisor of an employee identified as a mandated reporter shall not prohibit an employee or a volunteer from directly reporting child maltreatment to the Child Abuse Hotline.

An employer or supervisor of an employee identified as a mandated reporter shall not require an employee or a volunteer to obtain permission or notify any person, including an employee or a supervisor, before reporting child maltreatment to the Child Abuse Hotline.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2009, No. 1409, § 1; 2011, No. 1143, § 8; 2013, No. 725, § 7; 2013, No. 1086, §§ 7, 8; 2015, No. 1056, § 1; 2015, No. 1211, § 3; 2017, No. 250, § 12; 2019, No. 186, § 1; 2019, No. 531, § 3; 2019, No. 945, § 5.

Subchapter 5

— Notice Procedures After a Report of Suspected Child Maltreatment Has Been Made

12-18-501. Notice of a report to the Child Abuse Hotline.

Notice of a report to the Child Abuse Hotline is confidential and may be disclosed only as provided in this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-502. Release and disclosure of data generally.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall not release data that would identify the person who made the report to the Child Abuse Hotline unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release of the information after the court has reviewed in camera the record related to the report and has found it has reason to believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report.

However, upon request the information shall be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney or law enforcement.

A person or agency to whom disclosure is made shall not disclose to any other person a report or other information obtained pursuant to this section.

However, the person or agency is permitted to consult his or her own attorney regarding the information in any notice provided by the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 6.

12-18-503. Notification generally.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall notify the following of any report of child maltreatment within five (5) business days:

The legal parents, legal guardians, and current foster parent of a child in foster care who is named as a victim or alleged offender;

The attorney ad litem for any child named as the victim or alleged offender;

A person appointed by the court as the Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for any child named as the victim or alleged offender;

Counsel in a dependency-neglect case or family in need of services case when the child is named as a victim or alleged offender;

The attorney ad litem and Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for all other children in the same foster home if the child maltreatment occurred in a foster home;

The attorney ad litem and Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for any child in foster care when the alleged juvenile offender or underaged juvenile offender is placed in the same placement as the attorney ad litem or Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer's client;

The responsible multidisciplinary team; and

A mandated reporter, if the mandated reporter made the initial notification of suspected child maltreatment and the notification has been accepted for investigation.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “offender” for “aggressor” in (6); substituted “responsible” for “appropriate” in (7); and added (8).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 9; 2015, No. 1004, § 7.

12-18-504. Notification in cases of reports of severe maltreatment.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify local law enforcement of all reports of severe maltreatment.

Notification of a report of child maltreatment shall be provided within five (5) business days to the prosecuting attorney on an allegation of severe maltreatment.

The prosecuting attorney may provide written notice to the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police that the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police do not need to provide notification of the initial child maltreatment report to the prosecuting attorney's office.

Upon receiving the notification, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall not be required to provide notification of the initial child maltreatment report to the prosecuting attorney's office.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 8.

12-18-505. Notification to the child's school.

The Department of Human Services shall notify the child's school if the department takes a seventy-two-hour hold on the child or if the court awards the department custody of the child.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-506. Notice when the alleged offender works with children, the elderly, an individual with a disability, an individual with a mental illness, is engaged in child-related activities, or is a juvenile.

If the Child Abuse Hotline receives a report naming as an alleged offender a person who is engaged in child-related activities or employment, works with the elderly, an individual with a disability, or an individual with a mental illness, or is a juvenile and the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police has determined that children, the elderly, or individuals with a disability or mental illness under the care of the alleged offender appear to be at risk of maltreatment by the alleged offender, the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police may notify the following of the report made to the Child Abuse Hotline:

The alleged offender's employer;

The school superintendent, principal, or a person in an equivalent position where the alleged offender is employed;

The person in charge of a paid or volunteer activity; and

The appropriate licensing or registering authority to the extent necessary to carry out its official responsibilities.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate rules to ensure that notification required under this section is specifically approved by a responsible manager in the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police before the notification is made.

If the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police, based on information gathered during the course of the investigation, determine that there is no preponderance of the evidence indicating that children under the care of the alleged offender appear to be at risk, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the previously notified person or entity of that information.

If the Child Abuse Hotline receives a report naming a juvenile as an alleged offender who is in a setting or circumstances where other children may be at risk, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may notify the entity or person in charge about the Child Abuse Hotline report.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate rules to ensure that the notification required under this section is specifically approved by a responsible manager in the Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police before notification is made.

If the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police, based on information gathered during the course of the investigation, determine that there is no preponderance of the evidence indicating that children appear to be at risk, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the person or entity originally notified under subdivision (d)(1) of this section of that information.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section heading and introductory language in (a); and added (d).

The 2015 amendment, in the introductory language of (a),inserted “or the Department of Arkansas State Police” twice and substituted the second occurrence of “Department of Human Services” for “department”.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (c).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

The notice required under this section shall include notice of the Child Abuse Hotline's receipt of a report of suspected child maltreatment.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police may promulgate rules and enter into memoranda of understanding with the United States Department of Defense and its subdivisions to ensure that the notification required under this section is provided.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 945, § 11: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some juveniles in Arkansas may be unaware of their rights under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., and other applicable law; that some individuals and entities that are responsible for the welfare of a juvenile may be unaware of the rights of the juvenile under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., and other applicable law; that the creation of the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission will help increase awareness of a juvenile's legal rights; that independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas is more than likely to result in recommendations that will further improve the procedures and operations of the child welfare system; and that this act is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

An interview with the alleged victim;

A visit to the home of the alleged victim if appropriate given the type of child maltreatment alleged; and

Evidence from a collateral witness;

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 802, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)All members of society desire the safety of all children;

“(2)A child raised under constant adult supervision may miss opportunities for growth that will negatively impact his or her mental and physical development;

“(3)The alarming rise of childhood obesity and diabetes is almost certainly linked to an increase in the sedentary lifestyle and lack of physical activity for children today, which is often encouraged by parents and guardians, including without limitation by insisting on driving their children to school;

“(4)As measured by incidences of mental health difficulties, the over-supervised youth of today experience more difficulties when they reach adulthood than earlier generations;

“(5)Earlier generations learned resilience by walking, bicycling, playing, helping, and solving problems without constant adult intervention;

“(6)Parents and guardians are often in the best position to weigh the risk and make decisions concerning the safety of children under their care, including without limitation where their child may go, with whom, and when; and

“(7)Parents and guardians who have done nothing more than briefly and safely permitted their children to remain unsupervised should not be subject to investigation and possible prosecution as it causes unnecessary governmental intrusion and diversion of valuable public resources.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act:

“(1)Protect and promote the inherent right of a parent or guardian to raise his or her children;

“(2)Protect the decision of a parent or a guardian to grant his or her children unsupervised time to engage in activities that include without limitation playing outside, walking to school, bicycling, remaining briefly in a vehicle, and remaining at home; and

“(3)Ensure that valuable public resources are used most effectively to protect children by providing a secondary review to ensure that:

“(A)Calls to the Child Abuse Hotline are properly accepted;

“(B)Child maltreatment investigations are closed when the results of the investigation indicate that the allegations lack merit; and

“(C)Only the names of offenders who pose a risk to a vulnerable population are placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “accepting and documenting” for “screening out” in (d)(1).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1004 inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (d)(1) and (2).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1215 added (e) and (f).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a) and (b); deleted former (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; deleted “if an appropriate referral is made to a community organization or voluntary preventive service” following “imminent harm” in (c)(1); substituted “established in accordance with subsections (a) and (b)” for “described in subdivisions (d)(1) and (2)” in (d)(1); and updated an internal reference in (d)(2).

The allegation is severe maltreatment, excluding an allegation:

Of sexual abuse if the most recent allegation of sexual abuse was more than one (1) year ago or the alleged victim does not currently have contact with the alleged offender;

Of abandonment and the child is in a facility;

Of cuts, welts, bruises, or suffocation if the most recent allegation was more than one (1) year ago and the alleged victim is in the custody of the Department of Human Services; or

In which the alleged victim is in a facility and does not currently have contact with the alleged offender;

The allegation is that a child has been subjected to neglect as defined in § 12-18-103(14)(B); or

A child has died suddenly and unexpectedly.

At the initial time of contact with the alleged offender, the person conducting the investigation shall advise the alleged offender of the allegations made against the alleged offender in a manner that is consistent with the laws protecting the rights of the person who made the report.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall:

Upon initiation of the investigation, the primary focus of the investigation shall be whether or not the alleged offender has access to children and whether or not children are at risk such that children need to be protected.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “more than one (1) year ago or” for “more than one (1) year ago and” in (b)(2)(A).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1004 redesignated former (a)(1) as (a); and inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1026 inserted designation (b)(2)(A)(i); and added (b)(2)(A)(ii) and (iii).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1211 redesignated former (a)(1) as (a); in (a), inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” and “or notification of a child death”;added (b)(2)(C); inserted present (d); and redesignated former (d) as (e).

The 2017 amendment deleted (b)(2)(C)(ii); and redesignated (b)(2)(C)(i) as (b)(2)(C).

The 2019 amendment inserted “Of” in (b)(2)(A)(i) through (b)(2)(A)(iii); and added (b)(2)(A)(iv).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 10;
2015, No. 1026, § 4.

12-18-507. Notice when the alleged victim is a resident of a facility licensed, registered, or operated by the state.

If the Child Abuse Hotline receives a report that a client or a resident of a facility licensed or registered by the State of Arkansas has been subjected to child maltreatment while at the facility, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the facility director and the facility's licensing or registering authority of the Child Abuse Hotline's receipt of a report of suspected child maltreatment.

If the Child Abuse Hotline receives a report that a client or a resident of a facility operated by the Department of Human Services or a facility operated under contract with the Department of Human Services has been subjected to child maltreatment while at the facility, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the appropriate division director and the facility director of the Child Abuse Hotline's receipt of initial report of suspected child maltreatment.

If the Child Abuse Hotline receives a report that a child in the custody of the Department of Human Services has been subjected to child maltreatment while in the custody of the Department of Human Services, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the appropriate division director of the Child Abuse Hotline's receipt of an initial report of suspected child maltreatment.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 11; 2015, No. 1004, § 9.

12-18-508. Notice to United States military organizations of alleged child maltreatment — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Active duty service member” means a military member on full-time duty in the United States Army, United States Marine Corps, United States Navy, or United States Air Force;

“Child” means a biological child, adopted child, stepchild, foster child, or ward of an active duty service member; and

“Family advocacy program” means a congressionally mandated United States Department of Defense activity implemented through branches of the United States Armed Forces to address domestic abuse and child abuse through prevention, response, clinical assessment, treatment, and related services for active duty service members and their families.

When the Child Abuse Hotline accepts a report involving as an alleged victim a child of an active duty service member, the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the applicable family advocacy program or other person or entity designated by the military authority for the military installation associated with the active duty service member.

When the Child Abuse Hotline accepts a report involving as an alleged offender a person who is an active duty service member, the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the applicable family advocacy program or other person or entity designated by the military authority for the military installation associated with the active duty service member.

(1)When the Child Abuse Hotline accepts a report alleging child maltreatment that occurred during an activity conducted or sanctioned by the United States Department of Defense or its subdivisions, or occurred at a facility operated by the United States Department of Defense or its subdivisions, the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the applicable family advocacy program or other person or entity designated by the military authority for the military installation associated with the activity or facility.

Facilities covered under the notification requirement in subdivision (d)(1) of this section include without limitation all military installations and recruiting locations, as well as schools, daycares, and youth programs operated by the United States Department of Defense or its subdivisions, and schools, daycares, and youth programs that are allowed to operate on military installations, recruiting locations, or other military facilities.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 528, § 1.

Subchapter 6

— Investigative Proceedings

12-18-601. Assignment to investigative agency.

(1)If a report of child maltreatment is accepted by the Child Abuse Hotline, an investigation shall be conducted under procedures established by the Department of Human Services.

The procedures established by the Department of Human Services shall require the:

Assignment of a report of child maltreatment to the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police as the investigating agency;

Assignment of a report of child maltreatment to the Division of Arkansas State Police if the report involves:

Severe maltreatment;

A person, agency, corporation, or partnership that provides substitute care for a child who is in the custody of the Department of Human Services; or

A person, agency, corporation, or partnership that provides substitute care for a child who is in the custody of an employee of the Department of Human Services or another person who resides in the home of an employee of the Department of Human Services; and

Assignment of a report of child maltreatment that qualifies for triage procedures that are developed and implemented under this section and as prescribed by triage procedures in lieu of an assignment for investigation by the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police.

(1)(A)After the assignment of a report of child maltreatment, the investigating agency shall initiate an investigation as provided under this subchapter.

After initiating the investigation and interviewing the alleged victim, the investigating agency shall review the report of child maltreatment to determine if the investigation should be administratively closed under §12-18-702 without complying with the requirements of this subchapter regarding a complete investigation.

If an investigation is not administratively closed under §12-18-702, the investigating agency shall comply with the requirements of this subchapter regarding a complete investigation.

(A)The investigating agency shall administratively close an investigation under procedures that are established by the Department of Human Services.

The procedures established by the Department of Human Services shall require the:

Closure of an investigation if there is no evidence to support the report of child maltreatment other than the report made to the Child Abuse Hotline;

Closure of an investigation if there is insufficient detail to investigate the report of child maltreatment;

(a)Closure of an investigation that is based on an allegation made by an anonymous reporter if there is no evidence to corroborate the report of child maltreatment after the investigating agency has conducted a preliminary investigation to determine whether there is any evidence to corroborate the report of child maltreatment.

A preliminary investigation shall include:

Closure of an investigation if:

There has not been an additional report of abuse or neglect that has been committed by the alleged offender who is the subject of the current report;

The investigator reviews the prior history of child maltreatment related to the family of the child and to the offender and determines that the health and safety of the child can be assured without further investigation by the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police; and

The investigator determines that abuse or neglect of the child did not occur; and

Approval of the:

Director of the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services or his or her designee for the administrative closure of an investigation that is conducted by the Department of Human Services; or

Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police or his or her designee for the administrative closure of an investigation conducted by the Division of Arkansas State Police.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police may develop and implement triage procedures for accepting and documenting reports of child maltreatment of a child not at risk of imminent harm.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall not implement this section until rules necessary to carry out this subsection have been promulgated pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.

(1)With regard to the procedures established in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the Department of Human Services shall assess the safety of a child upon the receipt of an accepted child maltreatment report.

The assessment under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall include each underlying issue or additional child maltreatment concern that may not have been identified in the original Child Abuse Hotline report.

The Department of Human Services shall work with families related to an accepted child maltreatment report to remedy the conditions or issues that resulted in the child maltreatment report.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 10; 2015, No. 1004, § 10; 2015, No. 1215, § 3; 2019, No. 802, § 3.